Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 13.40.0357 and 2023 c 295 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORYjuveniledispositionoffensecategorydescription (rcw citation)juvenile dispositioncategory forattempt, bailjump,conspiracy, orsolicitationÂ Arson and Malicious MischiefÂ AArson 1 (9A.48.020)B+Â BArson 2 (9A.48.030)CÂ CReckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040)DÂ DReckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050)EÂ BMalicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070)CÂ CMalicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080)DÂ DMalicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090)EÂ ETampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus (9.40.100)EÂ ETampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus with Intent to Commit Arson (9.40.105)EÂ APossession of Incendiary Device (9.40.120)B+Â Â Assault and Other Crimes Involving Physical HarmÂ Â AAssault 1 (9A.36.011)B+Â B+Assault 2 (9A.36.021)C+Â C+Assault 3 (9A.36.031)D+Â D+Assault 4 (9A.36.041)EÂ B+Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) committed at age 15 or underC+Â A++Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) committed at age 16 or 17AÂ D+Reckless Endangerment (9A.36.050)EÂ C+Promoting Suicide Attempt (9A.36.060)D+Â D+Coercion (9A.36.070)EÂ C+Custodial Assault (9A.36.100)D+Â Â Burglary and TrespassÂ Â B+Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) committed atage 15 or underC+Â A-Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) committed atage 16 or 17B+Â BResidential Burglary (9A.52.025)CÂ BBurglary 2 (9A.52.030)CÂ DBurglary Tools (Possession of) (9A.52.060)EÂ DCriminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070)EÂ ECriminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080)EÂ CMineral Trespass (78.44.330)CÂ CVehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095)DÂ DVehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100)EÂ Â DrugsÂ Â EPossession/Consumption of Alcohol (66.44.270)EÂ CIllegally Obtaining Legend Drug (69.41.020)DÂ C+Sale, Delivery, Possession of Legend Drug with Intent to Sell (69.41.030(2)(a))D+Â EPossession of LegendDrug (69.41.030(2)(b))EÂ B+Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Sale (69.50.401(2) (a) or (b))B+Â CViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Sale (69.50.401(2)(c))CÂ EPossession of Cannabis <40 grams (69.50.4014)EÂ CFraudulently Obtaining Controlled Substance (69.50.403)CÂ C+Sale of Controlled Substance for Profit (69.50.410)C+Â EUnlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020)EÂ BViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Counterfeit Substances (69.50.4011(2) (a) or (b))BÂ CViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Counterfeit Substances (69.50.4011(2) (c), (d), or (e))CÂ EViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance (69.50.4013)EÂ CViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance (69.50.4012)CÂ Â Firearms and WeaponsÂ Â B++Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300)((C))BÂ B++Possession of Stolen Firearm(9A.56.310)((C))BÂ ((E))DCarrying Loaded Pistol Without Permit (9.41.050)((E))DÂ ((C))B+Possession of Firearms by Minor (<18) (9.41.040(2)(a) (v))((C))B+Â ((D+))C+Possession of Dangerous Weapon (9.41.250)((E))DÂ D+Intimidating Another Person by use of Weapon (9.41.270)((E))DÂ Â HomicideÂ Â A+Murder 1 (9A.32.030)AÂ A+Murder 2 (9A.32.050)B+Â B+Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060)C+Â C+Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070)D+Â B+Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520)C+Â Â KidnappingÂ Â AKidnap 1 (9A.40.020)B+Â B+Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030)C+Â C+Unlawful Imprisonment (9A.40.040)D+Â Â Obstructing Governmental OperationÂ Â DObstructing a Law Enforcement Officer (9A.76.020)EÂ EResisting Arrest (9A.76.040)EÂ BIntroducing Contraband 1 (9A.76.140)CÂ CIntroducing Contraband 2 (9A.76.150)DÂ EIntroducing Contraband 3 (9A.76.160)EÂ B+Intimidating a Public Servant (9A.76.180)C+Â B+Intimidating a Witness (9A.72.110)C+Â Â Public DisturbanceÂ Â C+Criminal Mischief with Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(b))D+Â D+Criminal Mischief Without Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(a))EÂ EFailure to Disperse (9A.84.020)EÂ EDisorderly Conduct (9A.84.030)EÂ Â Sex CrimesÂ Â ARape 1 (9A.44.040)B+Â B++Rape 2 (9A.44.050) committed at age 14 or underB+Â A-Rape 2 (9A.44.050) committed at age 15 through age 17B+Â C+Rape 3 (9A.44.060)D+Â B++Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073)committed at age 14 or underB+Â A-Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073)committed at age 15B+Â B+Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076)C+Â BIncest 1 (9A.64.020(1))CÂ CIncest 2 (9A.64.020(2))DÂ D+Indecent Exposure (Victim <14) (9A.88.010)EÂ EIndecent Exposure (Victim 14 or over) (9A.88.010)EÂ B+Promoting Prostitution 1 (9A.88.070)C+Â C+Promoting Prostitution 2 (9A.88.080)D+Â EO & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030)EÂ B+Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100)C+Â B++Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) committed at age 14 or underB+Â A-Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) committed at age 15 through age 17B+Â BChild Molestation 2 (9A.44.086)C+Â CFailure to Register as a Sex Offender (9A.44.132)DÂ Â Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and ForgeryÂ Â BTheft 1 (9A.56.030)CÂ CTheft 2 (9A.56.040)DÂ DTheft 3 (9A.56.050)EÂ BTheft of Livestock 1 and 2 (9A.56.080 and 9A.56.083)CÂ CForgery (9A.60.020)DÂ ARobbery 1 (9A.56.200) committed atage 15 or underB+Â A++Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) committed atage 16 or 17AÂ B+Robbery 2 (9A.56.210)C+Â B+Extortion 1 (9A.56.120)C+Â C+Extortion 2 (9A.56.130)D+Â CIdentity Theft 1 (9.35.020(2))DÂ DIdentity Theft 2 (9.35.020(3))EÂ DImproperly Obtaining Financial Information (9.35.010)EÂ BPossession of a Stolen Vehicle (9A.56.068)CÂ BPossession of Stolen Property 1 (9A.56.150)CÂ CPossession of Stolen Property 2 (9A.56.160)DÂ DPossession of Stolen Property 3 (9A.56.170)EÂ BTaking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (9A.56.070)CÂ CTaking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (9A.56.075)DÂ BTheft of a Motor Vehicle (9A.56.065)CÂ Â Motor Vehicle Related CrimesÂ Â EDriving Without a License (46.20.005)EÂ B+Hit and Run - Death (46.52.020(4)(a))C+Â CHit and Run - Injury (46.52.020(4)(b))DÂ DHit and Run-Attended (46.52.020(5))EÂ EHit and Run-Unattended (46.52.010)EÂ CVehicular Assault (46.61.522)DÂ CAttempting to Elude Pursuing Police Vehicle (46.61.024)DÂ EReckless Driving (46.61.500)EÂ DDriving While Under the Influence (46.61.502 and 46.61.504)EÂ B+Felony Driving While Under the Influence (46.61.502(6))BÂ B+Felony Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (46.61.504(6))BÂ Â OtherÂ Â BAnimal Cruelty 1 (16.52.205)CÂ BBomb Threat (9.61.160)CÂ CEscape 11 (9A.76.110)CÂ CEscape 21 (9A.76.120)CÂ DEscape 3 (9A.76.130)EÂ EObscene, Harassing, Etc., Phone Calls (9.61.230)EÂ AOther Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class A FelonyB+Â BOther Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class B FelonyCÂ COther Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class C FelonyDÂ DOther Offense Equivalent to an Adult Gross MisdemeanorEÂ EOther Offense Equivalent to an Adult MisdemeanorEÂ VViolation of Order of Restitution, Community Supervision, or Confinement (13.40.200)2 V1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses and the standard range is established as follows:1st escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 28 days confinement2nd escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement3rd and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks confinement2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDSThis schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may select sentencing option A, B, C, or D.Â Â OPTION AJUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRIDSTANDARD RANGEÂ A++129 to 260 weeks for all category A++ offensesÂ A+180 weeks to age 21 for all category A+ offensesÂ A103-129 weeks for all category A offensesÂ A-30-40 weeks52-65 weeks80-100 weeks103-129 weeks103-129 weeksÂ B++15-36 weeks52-65 weeks80-100 weeks103-129 weeks103-129 weeksCURRENTB+15-36 weeks15-36 weeks52-65 weeks80-100 weeks103-129 weeksOFFENSEBLSLS15-36 weeks15-36 weeks52-65 weeksCATEGORYC+LSLSLS15-36 weeks15-36 weeksÂ CLSLSLSLS15-36 weeksÂ D+LSLSLSLSLSÂ DLSLSLSLSLSÂ ELSLSLSLSLSPRIOR01234 or moreADJUDICATIONSÂ Â Â NOTE: References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement. "LS" means "local sanctions" as defined in RCW 13.40.020.(1) The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category. The current offense category is determined by the offense of adjudication.(2) The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count as one point. Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.(3) The standard range disposition for each offense is determined by the intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications and the row defined by the current offense category.(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense.(5) A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of E. However, a disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.OROPTION BSUSPENDED DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE(1) If the offender is subject to a standard range disposition involving confinement by the department, the court may impose the standard range and suspend the disposition on condition that the offender comply with one or more local sanctions and any educational or treatment requirement. The treatment programs provided to the offender must be either research-based best practice programs as identified by the Washington state institute for public policy or the joint legislative audit and review committee, or for chemical dependency treatment programs or services, they must be evidence-based or research-based best practice programs. For the purposes of this subsection:(a) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the population; and(b) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the standard of evidence-based practices.(2) If the offender fails to comply with the suspended disposition, the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or may revoke the suspended disposition and order the disposition's execution.(3) An offender is ineligible for the suspended disposition option under this section if the offender:(a) Is adjudicated of an A+ or A++ offense;(b) Is fourteen years of age or older and is adjudicated of one or more of the following offenses:(i) A class A offense, or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit a class A offense;(ii) Manslaughter in the first degree (RCW 9A.32.060);(iii) Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021), extortion in the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120), kidnapping in the second degree (RCW 9A.40.030), drive-by shooting (RCW 9A.36.045), vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), hit and run death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a)), ((or)) manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070), unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second degree (RCW 9.41.040), theft of a firearm (RCW 9A.56.300), or possession of a stolen firearm (9A.56.310); or(iv) Violation of the uniform controlled substances act (RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) and (b)), when the offense includes infliction of bodily harm upon another or when during the commission or immediate withdrawal from the offense the respondent was armed with a deadly weapon;(c) Is ordered to serve a disposition for a firearm violation under RCW 13.40.193;(d) Is adjudicated of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or(e) Has a prior option B disposition.OROPTION CCHEMICAL DEPENDENCY/MENTAL HEALTH DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVEIf the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed a B++ or B+ offense, the court may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.OROPTION DMANIFEST INJUSTICEIf the court determines that a disposition under option A, B, or C would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).--- END ---